District of Columbia statutes.
47-2851.15

Existing licenses or permits.

(a)

A license or permit issued by the District which is valid on the effective date of this subchapter need not be registered under the basic business license system until the renewal or expiration date of that license or permit under the law in effect prior to the effective date of this subchapter, unless it has been otherwise revoked or suspended.

(b)

Upon the renewal date of the above-referenced license or permit, the applicant shall receive a renewal date in accordance with § 47-2851.09.

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 101(b), 45 DCR 1172
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2002(b), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 2(o), 50 DCR 6913
1981 Ed., § 47-2851.15.
D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (a), substituted “basic” for “master”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(o) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).